Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5077YH (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2066 Section 1. Section 16.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 2. a. The members of the authority appointed by the 3 governor on or before June 30, 2026, shall serve for staggered 4 terms of six years beginning and ending as provided in section 5 69.19 . 6 b. The members of the authority appointed by the governor on 7 or after July 1, 2026, shall serve for staggered terms of four 8 years beginning and ending as provided in section 69.19. 9 c. A person appointed by the governor to fill a vacancy 10 shall serve only for the unexpired portion of the term. A 11 member is eligible for reappointment. The ex officio voting 12 member designated by the agricultural development board shall 13 serve at the pleasure of that board. A member of the authority 14 may be removed from office by the governor for misfeasance, 15 malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty or other just cause, 16 after notice and hearing, unless the notice and hearing is 17 expressly waived in writing. 18 Sec. 2. Section 16.2C, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 2026, 19 is amended to read as follows: 20 c. (1) Members appointed on or before June 30, 2026, shall 21 serve for staggered terms of six years beginning and ending as 22 provided in section 69.19 . 23 (2) Members appointed on or after July 1, 2026, shall serve 24 for staggered terms of four years beginning and ending as 25 provided in section 69.19. 26 (3) A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only 27 for the unexpired portion of the memberâs term. A member is 28 eligible for reappointment. An appointed member may be removed 29 from office by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance, 30 willful neglect of duty, or other just cause, after notice and 31 hearing, unless the notice and hearing is expressly waived in 32 writing. 33 Sec. 3. Section 52.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 34 to read as follows: 35 -1- LSB 5077YH (3) 91 ss/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2066 1. The state commissioner of elections shall appoint three 1 members to a board of examiners for voting systems, not more 2 than two of whom shall be from the same political party. The 3 examiners Examiners appointed on or before June 30, 2026, 4 shall hold office for staggered terms of six years, subject to 5 removal at the pleasure of the state commissioner of elections. 6 Examiners appointed on or after July 1, 2026, shall hold office 7 for staggered terms of four years beginning and ending as 8 provided in section 69.19, subject to removal at the pleasure 9 of the state commissioner of elections. 10 Sec. 4. Section 97B.8A, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 11 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 d. (1) The appointive terms of the members appointed by the 13 governor on or before June 30, 2026, are for a period of six 14 years beginning and ending as provided in section 69.19 . 15 (2) The appointive terms of the members appointed by the 16 governor on or after July 1, 2026, are for a period of four 17 years beginning and ending as provided in section 69.19. 18 (3) If there is a vacancy in the membership of the board 19 for one of the members appointed by the governor, the governor 20 has the power of appointment. Gubernatorial appointees to this 21 board are subject to confirmation by the senate. 22 Sec. 5. Section 256.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 3. a. The terms of office for voting members appointed on 25 or before June 30, 2026, are for six years beginning and ending 26 as provided in section 69.19 . 27 b. The terms of office for voting members appointed on or 28 after July 1, 2026, are for four years beginning and ending as 29 provided in section 69.19. 30 Sec. 6. Section 262.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 262.2 Appointment ââ term of office. 33 1. The members shall be appointed by the governor subject 34 to confirmation by the senate. Prior to appointing the ninth 35 -2- LSB 5077YH (3) 91 ss/ns 2/ 3 H.F. 2066 member as specified in section 262.1 , the governor shall 1 consult with the appropriate student body government at the 2 institution at which the proposed appointee is enrolled. 3 2. Subject to subsection 3: 4 a. The term of each member of the board appointed on or 5 before June 30, 2026, shall be for six years , unless . 6 b. The term of each member of the board appointed on or 7 after July 1, 2026, shall be for four years. 8 3. If the ninth member, appointed in accordance with section 9 262.1 , graduates or is no longer enrolled at an institution of 10 higher education under the boardâs control more than one year 11 before the expiration of the term , at which time the term of 12 the ninth member shall expire one year from the date on which 13 the member graduates or is no longer enrolled in an institution 14 of higher education under the boardâs control. However, if 15 within that year the ninth member reenrolls in any institution 16 of higher education under the boardâs control on a full-time 17 basis and is a student in good standing at either the graduate 18 or undergraduate level, the term of the ninth member shall 19 continue in effect. 20 4. The terms of three members of the board shall begin and 21 expire in each odd-numbered year as provided in section 69.19 . 22